Connecticut, session 2026, HB05177.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That title 12 of the general statutes be amended to create a tax credit
for manufacturers that donate equipment or supplies to manufacturing
training programs at public middle schools or public high schools in the
state.